Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 10. Railroad Abandonment

§ 37-9-1001.
Policy to prevent abandonment.

It is the policy of this state to prevent the loss of railroad service and competition in the provision of railroad service by preventing abandonment of railroad lines.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 85, § 1.

§ 37-9-1002.
Department of transportation authority to take action; when action may be taken; attorney general and department of transportation responsibility.

To fulfill the policy stated in W.S.

37-9-1001

the department of transportation shall, subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, take the following actions:

Protest applications filed or other actions taken by a rail carrier to abandon railroad lines;

Protest, challenge by legal action or intervene in rail carrier actions leading to potential abandonment of railroad lines;

Investigate the evidence offered by a rail carrier supporting the subsidy amount or minimum sale or salvage price of railroad lines to be abandoned and intervene in abandonment proceedings to challenge unjustified subsidy amounts and minimum sale or salvage prices;

Provide technical assistance to prospective rail carriers and to counties and municipalities seeking to purchase and operate railroad lines which other rail carriers are seeking to abandon or are likely to seek to abandon and provide assistance in preparing any filings with federal agencies necessary for them to purchase the railroad lines at the minimum sale or salvage price or to begin operations;

Bring a legal action or intervene in a legal action or regulatory action to reduce the costs of trackage rights established in an agreement where the costs or conditions of the agreement appear to be contributing to potential abandonment of railroad lines or discouraging discovery of a prospective replacement rail carrier.

The department shall take the actions authorized in subsection (a) of this section if:

A danger of potential abandonment of a railroad line exists which will cause an adverse impact on rural and community development;

The county commissioners of any county or the governing body of any municipality in which any part of a railroad line subject to potential abandonment is located requests action;

The governor directs action to be taken; or

The department determines action is necessary to protect the public interest.

The department may decide not to take any action authorized in subsection (a) of this section if it determines the action does not have a reasonable chance of fulfilling the policy stated in W.S.

37-9-1001

.

The attorney general shall assist and represent the department in any action taken as authorized in this section.

The department is responsible for state rail planning and shall assist the attorney general in any action taken as authorized in subsection (a) of this section and shall provide technical advice and assistance to counties, municipalities and prospective rail carriers seeking to purchase and operate railroad lines which are abandoned or subject to potential abandonment.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 85, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.